Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 9. Insolvent Banks
§ 81-9-43.
Procedure to obtain depositors’ liquidation.

Proceedings to accomplish depositor liquidation of banks shall be begun by the filing of a petition in the chancery court of the county in which such bank shall be domiciled within the ninety day period in which the state comptroller remains in charge of the closed bank. Each petition shall be signed by depositors owning sixty percent in amount of deposits not preferred and totally unsecured, and the allegations thereof shall be sworn to by at least one of the signers of the petition, either as true and correct upon personal knowledge, or upon information and belief. If any signer be a corporation the signature thereof by the president or vice-president shall be sufficient, and the signature of any partnership or similar firm by any member thereof shall be sufficient. The state comptroller shall be the only necessary party respondent to such petition. The petition may be heard by the chancellor in vacation or in term time, at such place in his district as he may direct, upon certificate of the chancery clerk that he has sent, at least five days before such hearing, by registered mail, to the respondent at the city of Jackson, Mississippi, a true copy of the petition, with time and place of hearing designated thereon. The cause in which such petition shall be filed shall be entitled “In the matter of the depositor liquidation of (name of bank proposed to be liquidated) by (naming here the liquidating corporation proposed to be formed).”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5262; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-45.
Petition and decree thereon.

If the petition shall be signed and sworn to as aforesaid, and shall pray that the liquidation of the bank shall be conducted by the depositors and that a liquidating corporation be formed for such purpose, the chancellor shall, by decree on such petition, create a liquidating corporation, not for pecuniary gain, and without capital or capital stock. The decree shall name five directors for the corporation who shall be natural persons chosen by the chancellor from among the signers of the petition, but such signers as may be named as directors in the petition shall be so named in the decree. The decree shall give the corporation a name, which shall include the words, “liquidating corporation,” preceded by the name of the bank to be liquidated. The municipality in which the bank to be liquidated is domiciled shall be the domicile of the corporation. The decree shall be recorded on the book of corporation charters in the office of the chancery clerk of the proper county, and need not be published.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5263; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-47.
Effect of decree.

The signing of the decree shall divest the state comptroller and the department of bank supervision of all title to the assets of the bank and of all control of the liquidation thereof, and the state comptroller and the department shall be relieved of future liability thereto, except for proper delivery of the assets of the corporation. The recording of a certified copy of the decree in the deed records of any county shall have the same effect as the recording of a deed to the assets.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5264; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-49.
General powers of liquidating corporation.

Liquidating corporations created under the authority of this chapter shall be bodies corporate and politic, with power to sue and be sued by their respective corporate names. No action shall be begun against any such corporation except in the county in which it is domiciled. The corporation shall have as its seal the seal of the bank which it is liquidating. Such corporation shall have generally the powers and responsibilities of receivers with respect to the assets and liabilities of all banks which they shall liquidate. Acts involving discretion shall be subject to approval of the chancery court, except as herein specifically provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5265; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-51.
Double liability of certain stockholders released.

Such corporation shall have power to bring suits to enforce any liability of directors or officers of the bank, but the double liability of stockholders, as provided in Section 81-5-27, by the turning over of the liquidation by the depositors as herein provided, shall be released as to all stockholders of any such bank. However, no stockholder shall be refunded any sum of money which he may have actually paid in discharge of his double liability, nor shall the release of double liability provided by this section be construed to extend to any instance where a stockholder shall have executed a promissory note or other instrument of writing in settlement of such double liability. All double liabilities of stockholders, as referred to in this section, are canceled and released with respect to future liquidations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5266; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-53.
Bond of directors; compensation.

Each director shall make bond, conditioned to perform faithfully his duties as director, payable to the corporation, with such surety or sureties as the chancellor may approve, and in such sum as the chancellor may, from time to time, direct, but in no case less than $2,000.00 for any one director. Such bonds shall serve generally the same purposes and be of the same general effect as a receiver’s bond, and action upon such bonds may be brought by any party aggrieved. No action shall lie, however, against any director or upon any director’s bond because of the exercise of any power recited in Section 81-9-61, excepting only instances of actual abuse of discretion.

No director shall be entitled to compensation as such, but the chancellor, may, in his discretion, allow conservative compensation on a salary basis for designated period of time, in instances where an unreasonable amount of any director’s time shall be required for the faithful performance of his duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5267; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-55.
Vacancies and removal of directors.

Vacancies among directors shall be filled by the chancellor on ex parte hearing in term time, or in vacation, but the choice of any four remaining directors shall be the choice of the chancellor, except for good cause shown. Removal of directors shall be in the discretion of the chancellor, in term time or in vacation, on petition of any party aggrieved, and upon such notice not less than five days as the chancellor may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5268; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-57.
Officers of the corporation.

The directors shall choose from among themselves a president and a vice-president of the corporation. They shall also employ a liquidator who shall be ex officio secretary-treasurer of the corporation, and who need not be a depositor in the bank being liquidated by the corporation. No officer, except the liquidator, shall be entitled to compensation as such. The liquidator shall furnish bond, payable to the corporation, in such amount and with such surety or sureties as may be approved by the directors, conditioned to perform his duties faithfully as liquidator, and action upon such bond may be brought by any party aggrieved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5269; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-59.
Compensation of liquidator and other employees.

The directors shall fix the compensation of the liquidator, may employ and fix the compensation of counsel for the corporation; and may employ and fix the compensation of such clerical and other employees as they may deem necessary or advisable to carry on the business of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5270; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-61.
Exercise of discretion without approval of court.

By authority of order on the minutes signed by all five directors, the corporation may do and perform, without approval of court, the following, to-wit:

Employ and fix the compensations of the liquidator, counsel and other employees;

Lease premises to be occupied by the corporation as business quarters;

Borrow money, execute promissory notes, and pledge or mortgage the assets of the corporation;

Compromise or extend indebtedness due the bank being liquidated, and release and surrender securities and collaterals;

Compromise claims against the bank;

Sell any or all assets of the bank for cash or on other terms;

Barter or exchange any assets of the bank for other property;

Lease any property belonging to the bank;

Pay dividends to creditors or stockholders of the bank.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5271; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-63.
Sale of assets to going bank.

By and with the approval of the chancellor and of the state comptroller any liquidating corporation may sell any portion or all of the assets of the bank being liquidated by such corporation to an active and operating bank, the purchase price to be in cash or on terms, or otherwise; or, the purchasing bank may be allowed to assume a percentage of the liabilities of the insolvent bank, with optional privilege to the creditors to receive cash or other property in settlement of their claims. Under this section chancellors shall have broad powers and discretion to approve plans which are for the best interests of creditors of closed banks taken as a whole.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5272; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-65.
Corporation and directors may be restrained.

On petition of any party aggrieved, filed in the depositor liquidation cause, the liquidating corporation and its directors and officers may, as in other cases, be enjoined by the chancellor from actual abuse of discretion.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5273; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-67.
Liquidating corporations may apply to court for directions.

Liquidating corporations shall have the power to apply in vacation to the chancellor for orders and directions concerning the liquidation, and this section shall be liberally construed in favor of speedy and economical liquidations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5274; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-69.
Records and inspection thereof.

Full and complete minutes shall be kept of all proceedings of the directors, and full and complete records and books of account shall be kept by the corporation. The directors shall have discretion to grant to parties of interest reasonable inspection and permission to take copies of all such minutes, records and books, and such reasonable inspection and right to take copies may be ordered by the chancellor in term time or vacation, upon reasonable notice to the corporation of time and place of a hearing on any petition seeking such inspection and right to take copies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5275; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-71.
Final report and dissolution of the corporation.

When the affairs of the bank shall be completely liquidated, or liquidated in so far as it is practical for the directors so to do, they shall make, or cause to be made, to the chancery court of the county in which the corporation is domiciled a final report, the correctness of which shall be sworn to by at least one director of the corporation, either upon personal knowledge or upon information and belief, after a careful examination of the report. Such report shall include the gross amount of collections and the total amount of all disbursements to common creditors, depositors, or other claimants, and the amount of all dividends on hand belonging to common creditors, stockholders, or others, which for any reason have not been distributed and they shall also file as part of such report the following books and records of said corporation, to wit: The journal and the general ledger kept by the corporation and the minute book of the corporation and also the ledger showing the amount due each depositor and other creditors at the time the corporation was created and upon which dividends were paid, or such other books, set of books, or records used by or that were set up by said corporation which reveal the above enumerated facts, and if available the audit of the department of bank supervision showing all assets and liabilities of the bank in liquidation.

The directors shall file a petition for their discharge and a dissolution of the corporation with their report, and the final report together with said petition shall remain on file subject to the inspection of any person interested for the time and in the manner hereinafter provided. Upon the filing of said petition and report in the chancery clerk’s office in the county in which the corporation is domiciled, the clerk shall immediately notify the chancellor by registered mail of the filing of said petition and report whereupon the chancellor by order entered upon the minutes of the court shall direct the clerk of the court to have a notice published in some newspaper in the county wherein the corporation is domiciled, or if none is so published, then in some newspaper having a general circulation therein, which notice shall state that the liquidation of the bank has been completed and that the final report of the directors and petition for their discharge and dissolution of the corporation are on file; that unless written objection is filed with the clerk of the court within forty-five (45) days from the date of the first publication of the notice, all persons shall be forever precluded from filing any claim against the bank, corporation, or the directors and officers, and from questioning any of the acts of the directors or officers except for fraud. Said notice shall be published once a week for four successive weeks.

Should the directors have dividends on hand belonging to the depositors, creditors, stockholders or others which have not been distributed, the notice hereinabove referred to shall specify this fact, and shall give the name of each party who is entitled to such dividend, but it shall not be necessary to give the amount thereof. The notice shall direct that said parties call for said dividends prior to the day set for the filing of written objections, otherwise their claim thereto shall be forfeited. On the day of the final hearing if there are dividends on hand which have not been called for, the directors shall not be discharged, or the corporation dissolved, but the chancellor by order entered on the minutes of the court shall direct the directors to make distribution of such unclaimed dividends to the known depositors and creditors pro rata; provided, that in the event the known depositors and creditors have already been paid in full, such unclaimed dividends shall be distributed to the stockholders pro rata.

If on the day of the final hearing there are no dividends on hand for distribution and there have been no objections filed to the discharge of the directors and the dissolution of the corporation, the chancellor shall enter an order granting the discharge of the directors and a dissolution of the corporation. If there are dividends on hand, the chancellor shall direct their distribution as above provided. Should written objections be filed to the discharge of the directors and the dissolution of the corporation within the time above provided, the chancellor shall set the matter for hearing in vacation or term time as he may deem proper, and the same shall be proceeded with as any other action in chancery. In no event shall anyone be permitted to file objections after the time specified in the notice above provided for.

Should there be any dividends not called for at the expiration of forty-five (45) days from the date the chancellor orders the distribution as provided in subsection (3) hereof, the directors shall pay the same to the state comptroller who shall hold the same for parties entitled thereto for a period of one year from the date of the order of the chancellor directing the distribution. If said funds are not called for before the expiration of said period, the owners shall lose all right thereto, and the state comptroller shall pay the same, or so much thereof as remains in his hands, into the state treasury. Upon the directors making the distribution provided for in subsection (3) hereof, either by paying said funds to the parties entitled thereto, or by paying the same or a part thereof to the state comptroller, they shall report such fact to the chancellor, who shall enter his decree granting the discharge of the directors and the dissolution of the corporation, and the court or chancellor in vacation, shall have the power and authority during the course of proceedings under this section to make all such orders as he may deem right and proper to fully carry out the purposes of this section.

When the final decree of the discharge and dissolution is entered by the court or chancellor in vacation, it shall be the duty of the clerk to immediately turn over to the state comptroller all the books of the corporation which have been filed with said cause and take a receipt from said comptroller therefor and file said receipt with the papers in said cause. It shall be the duty of the state comptroller to receive said books, and receipt therefor and to file and preserve the same in his office as other bank records.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5276; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1942, ch. 264.

§ 81-9-73.
When Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any similar corporation to be appointed receiver.

Whenever the state comptroller shall apply for appointment of a receiver under the provisions of this chapter, and the deposits of such bank shall be to any extent insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or any similar corporation organized under the laws of the United States, and it shall appear that said corporation will accept the receivership of said bank, then it shall be mandatory upon the chancellor to appoint said Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or any similar corporation organized under the laws of the United States, receiver of such bank. In such event, the receivership may be conducted by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any similar corporation organized under the laws of the United States, at its option, in the proper chancery court of this state and under the provisions of this chapter applicable to other bank receivers. In all instances in which the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or any similar corporation organized under the laws of the United States, shall pay any portion of the deposits of a bank in this state, it shall be fully subrogated to the position of depositors in so far as such payments are made and as equity and justice may appear.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5277; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-9-75.
Priority of claims for payment against certain insolvent banks upon liquidation or upon execution of purchase of assets and assumption of liabilities.

On liquidation of a state or private bank or on execution of a purchase of certain assets and assumption of certain liabilities of a state bank under this chapter, claims for payment against that state bank have the following priority:

Obligations incurred by the Banking Commissioner, fees and assessments due to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, and expenses of liquidation, including any taxes due, all of which may be covered by a proper reserve of funds;

Claims of depositors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims of salaried employees of the bank for salaries that are earned but unpaid at the time the bank is closed or purchased under this chapter;

Claims of general creditors having an approved claim against the general liquidating account of the bank;

Claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed by this code;

Approved claims of subordinated creditors; and

Claims of stockholders of the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.